Utah statutes.
17-52-301.   Procedure for appointing members to study committee.
(1)  Each member of a study committee shall be appointed by an appointment
council as provided in this section.
(2) (a)  The county executive shall convene a meeting of the three members of
the appointment council referred to in Subsections 17-52-101(1)(a), (b), and
(c) within ten days after the canvass of an election under Section 17-52-203.5
if a majority of those voting voted in favor of establishing a study
committee.
(b)  Within ten days of the convening of the first meeting under Subsection
(2)(a), the three members of the appointment council shall designate the
remaining two members referred to in Subsection 17-52-101(1)(d).
(3) (a)  Within 30 days of the designation of the remaining two members under
Subsection (2)(b), the appointment council shall:
(i)  appoint the members to the study committee; and
(ii)  notify in writing the appointees, the county executive, and the county
legislative body of the appointments.
(b)  In making appointments to the study committee, the appointment council
shall work to achieve a broadly representative membership.
(c)  The appointment council may not appoint a person to the study committee
unless that person:
(i)  is a registered voter in the county whose form of government will be
studied by the study committee; and
(ii)  does not hold any public office or employment other than membership on
the appointment council.
